District of Columbia statutes.
50-709

Fuel provider requirements.

Pursuant to § 246(e) of the Clean Air Act, fuel providers shall make clean fuels available to covered fleet operators at locations at which covered fleet vehicles are fueled.

Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-243, § 10
as added Mar. 14, 1995, D.C. Law 10-201, § 2(g), 41 DCR 7178
1981 Ed., § 40-2009.
“Section 246(e) of the Clean Air Act,” referred to in this section, is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 7586(e).